Illinois, session 104th, SB3251.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Sections 2-27, 2-28, and 2-33 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/2-27)  (from Ch. 37, par. 802-27)7    Sec. 2-27. Placement; legal custody or guardianship. 8    (1) If the court determines and puts in writing the 9factual basis supporting the determination of whether the 10parents, guardian, or legal custodian of a minor adjudged a 11ward of the court are unfit or are unable, for some reason 12other than financial circumstances alone, to care for, 13protect, train or discipline the minor or are unwilling to do 14so, and that the health, safety, and best interest of the minor 15will be jeopardized if the minor remains in the custody of the 16minor's parents, guardian or custodian, the court may at this 17hearing and at any later point:18        (a) place the minor in the custody of a suitable 19    relative or other person as legal custodian or guardian;20        (a-5) with the approval of the Department of Children 21    and Family Services, place the minor in the subsidized 22    guardianship of a suitable relative or other person as 23    legal guardian; "subsidized guardianship" has the meaning   SB3251- 2 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    ascribed to that term in Section 4d of the Children and 2    Family Services Act;3        (b) place the minor under the guardianship of a 4    probation officer;5        (c) commit the minor to an agency for care or 6    placement, except an institution under the authority of 7    the Department of Corrections or of the Department of 8    Children and Family Services;9        (d) on and after the effective date of this amendatory 10    Act of the 98th General Assembly and before January 1, 11    2017, commit the minor to the Department of Children and 12    Family Services for care and service; however, a minor 13    charged with a criminal offense under the Criminal Code of 14    1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or adjudicated 15    delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of or 16    committed to the Department of Children and Family 17    Services by any court, except (i) a minor less than 16 18    years of age and committed to the Department of Children 19    and Family Services under Section 5-710 of this Act, (ii) 20    a minor under the age of 18 for whom an independent basis 21    of abuse, neglect, or dependency exists, or (iii) a minor 22    for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition to 23    reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 24    2-33 of this Act. On and after January 1, 2017, commit the 25    minor to the Department of Children and Family Services 26    for care and service; however, a minor charged with a   SB3251- 3 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    criminal offense under the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 2    Criminal Code of 2012 or adjudicated delinquent shall not 3    be placed in the custody of or committed to the Department 4    of Children and Family Services by any court, except (i) a 5    minor less than 15 years of age and committed to the 6    Department of Children and Family Services under Section 7    5-710 of this Act, (ii) a minor under the age of 18 for 8    whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 9    exists, or (iii) a minor for whom the court has granted a 10    supplemental petition to reinstate wardship pursuant to 11    subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of this Act. An independent 12    basis exists when the allegations or adjudication of 13    abuse, neglect, or dependency do not arise from the same 14    facts, incident, or circumstances which give rise to a 15    charge or adjudication of delinquency. The Department 16    shall be given due notice of the pendency of the action and 17    the Guardianship Administrator of the Department of 18    Children and Family Services shall be appointed guardian 19    of the person of the minor. Whenever the Department seeks 20    to discharge a minor from its care and service, the 21    Guardianship Administrator shall petition the court for an 22    order terminating guardianship. The Guardianship 23    Administrator may designate one or more other officers of 24    the Department, appointed as Department officers by 25    administrative order of the Department Director, 26    authorized to affix the signature of the Guardianship   SB3251- 4 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    Administrator to documents affecting the guardian-ward 2    relationship of children for whom the Guardianship 3    Administrator has been appointed guardian at such times as 4    the Guardianship Administrator is unable to perform the 5    duties of the Guardianship Administrator office. The 6    signature authorization shall include but not be limited 7    to matters of consent of marriage, enlistment in the armed 8    forces, legal proceedings, adoption, major medical and 9    surgical treatment and application for driver's license. 10    Signature authorizations made pursuant to the provisions 11    of this paragraph shall be filed with the Secretary of 12    State and the Secretary of State shall provide upon 13    payment of the customary fee, certified copies of the 14    authorization to any court or individual who requests a 15    copy.16    (1.5) In making a determination under this Section, the 17court shall also consider whether, based on health, safety, 18and the best interests of the minor,19        (a) appropriate services aimed at family preservation 20    and family reunification have been unsuccessful in 21    rectifying the conditions that have led to a finding of 22    unfitness or inability to care for, protect, train, or 23    discipline the minor, or24        (b) no family preservation or family reunification 25    services would be appropriate,26and if the petition or amended petition contained an   SB3251- 5 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1allegation that the parent is an unfit person as defined in 2subdivision (D) of Section 1 of the Adoption Act, and the order 3of adjudication recites that parental unfitness was 4established by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall, 5when appropriate and in the best interest of the minor, enter 6an order terminating parental rights and appointing a guardian 7with power to consent to adoption in accordance with Section 82-29.9    When making a placement, the court, wherever possible, 10shall require the Department of Children and Family Services 11to select a person holding the same religious belief as that of 12the minor or a private agency controlled by persons of like 13religious faith of the minor and shall require the Department 14to otherwise comply with Section 7 of the Children and Family 15Services Act in placing the child. In addition, whenever 16alternative plans for placement are available, the court shall 17ascertain and consider, to the extent appropriate in the 18particular case, the views and preferences of the minor.19    (2)(i) When a minor is placed with a suitable relative or 20other person pursuant to item (a) of subsection (1), the court 21shall appoint the suitable relative or other person the legal 22custodian or guardian of the person of the minor. When a minor 23is committed to any agency, the court shall appoint the proper 24officer or representative thereof as legal custodian or 25guardian of the person of the minor. Legal custodians and 26guardians of the person of the minor appointed under   SB3251- 6 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1subsection (1) have the respective rights and duties set forth 2in subsection (8) or (9) of Section 1-3 except as otherwise 3provided by order of court; but no guardian of the person may 4consent to adoption of the minor unless that authority is 5conferred upon the guardian in accordance with Section 2-29. 6    (ii) The following additional provisions apply to legal 7custodians or guardians appointed under paragraphs (b), (c), 8and (d) of subsection (1):9        (A) When a minor is committed to any agency, the court 10    shall appoint the proper officer or representative thereof 11    as legal custodian or guardian of the person of the minor. 12        (B) An agency whose representative is appointed 13    guardian of the person or legal custodian of the minor may 14    place the minor in any child care facility, but the 15    facility must be licensed under the Child Care Act of 1969 16    or have been approved by the Department of Children and 17    Family Services as meeting the standards established for 18    such licensing. 19        (C) No agency may place a minor adjudicated under 20    Sections 2-3 or 2-4 in a child care facility unless the 21    placement is in compliance with the rules and regulations 22    for placement under this Section promulgated by the 23    Department of Children and Family Services under Section 5 24    of the Children and Family Services Act. Like authority 25    and restrictions shall be conferred by the court upon any 26    probation officer who has been appointed guardian of the   SB3251- 7 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    person of a minor.2    (3) No placement by any probation officer or agency whose 3representative is appointed guardian of the person or legal 4custodian of a minor may be made in any out of State child care 5facility unless it complies with the Interstate Compact on the 6Placement of Children. Placement with a parent, however, is 7not subject to that Interstate Compact.8    (4) The clerk of the court shall issue to the legal 9custodian or guardian of the person a certified copy of the 10order of court, as proof of the legal custodian's or 11guardian's authority. No other process is necessary as 12authority for the keeping of the minor.13    (5)(a) Custody or guardianship granted under (a) or (a-5) 14of subsection (1) this Section continues until the court 15otherwise directs, but not after the minor reaches the age of 1618 years. 17    (b) Custody or guardianship granted under paragraph (b), 18(c), or (d) of subsection (1), continues until the court 19otherwise directs, but not after the minor reaches the age of 2021 years. but not after the minor reaches the age of 19 years 21except as set forth in Section 2-31, or if the minor was 22previously committed to the Department of Children and Family 23Services for care and service and the court has granted a 24supplemental petition to reinstate wardship pursuant to 25subsection (2) of Section 2-33.26    (6) (Blank).  SB3251- 8 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-1061, eff. 7-1-25.) 2    (705 ILCS 405/2-28)3    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-107)4    Sec. 2-28. Court review. 5    (1) The court may require any legal custodian or guardian 6of the person appointed under this Act to report periodically 7to the court or may cite the legal custodian or guardian into 8court and require the legal custodian, guardian, or the legal 9custodian's or guardian's agency to make a full and accurate 10report of the doings of the legal custodian, guardian, or 11agency on behalf of the minor. The custodian or guardian, 12within 10 days after such citation, or earlier if the court 13determines it to be necessary to protect the health, safety, 14or welfare of the minor, shall make the report, either in 15writing verified by affidavit or orally under oath in open 16court, or otherwise as the court directs. Upon the hearing of 17the report the court may remove the custodian or guardian and 18appoint another in the custodian's or guardian's stead or 19restore the minor to the custody of the minor's parents or 20former guardian or custodian. However, custody of the minor 21shall not be restored to any parent, guardian, or legal 22custodian in any case in which the minor is found to be 23neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent under 24Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared for at 25home without endangering the minor's health or safety and it   SB3251- 9 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1is in the best interests of the minor, and if such neglect, 2abuse, or dependency is found by the court under paragraph (1) 3of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about due to the acts 4or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, or legal 5custodian, until such time as an investigation is made as 6provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the issue of 7the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 8care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 9parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 10minor.11    (1.5) The public agency that is the custodian or guardian 12of the minor shall file a written report with the court no 13later than 15 days after a minor in the agency's care remains:14        (1) in a shelter placement beyond 30 days;15        (2) in a psychiatric hospital past the time when the 16    minor is clinically ready for discharge or beyond medical 17    necessity for the minor's health; or18        (3) in a detention center or Department of Juvenile 19    Justice facility solely because the public agency cannot 20    find an appropriate placement for the minor.21    The report shall explain the steps the agency is taking to 22ensure the minor is placed appropriately, how the minor's 23needs are being met in the minor's shelter placement, and if a 24future placement has been identified by the Department, why 25the anticipated placement is appropriate for the needs of the 26minor and the anticipated placement date.   SB3251- 10 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    (1.6) Within 30 days after placing a child in its care in a 2qualified residential treatment program, as defined by the 3federal Social Security Act, the Department of Children and 4Family Services shall prepare a written report for filing with 5the court and send copies of the report to all parties. Within 620 days of the filing of the report, or as soon thereafter as 7the court's schedule allows but not more than 60 days from the 8date of placement, the court shall hold a hearing to consider 9the Department's report and determine whether placement of the 10child in a qualified residential treatment program provides 11the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child 12in the least restrictive environment and if the placement is 13consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the 14child, as specified in the permanency plan for the child. The 15court shall approve or disapprove the placement. If 16applicable, the requirements of Sections 2-27.1 and 2-27.2 17must also be met. The Department's written report and the 18court's written determination shall be included in and made 19part of the case plan for the child. If the child remains 20placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the 21Department shall submit evidence at each status and permanency 22hearing: 23        (A) demonstrating that ongoing on-going assessment of 24    the strengths and needs of the child continues to support 25    the determination that the child's needs cannot be met 26    through placement in a foster family home, that the   SB3251- 11 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    placement provides the most effective and appropriate 2    level of care for the child in the least restrictive, 3    appropriate environment, and that the placement is 4    consistent with the short-term and long-term permanency 5    goal for the child, as specified in the permanency plan 6    for the child; 7        (B) documenting the specific treatment or service 8    needs that should be met for the child in the placement and 9    the length of time the child is expected to need the 10    treatment or services; 11        (C) the efforts made by the agency to prepare the 12    child to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing 13    relative, a legal guardian, or an adoptive parent, or in a 14    foster family home; and 15        (D) beginning July 1, 2025, documenting the 16    Department's efforts regarding ongoing family finding and 17    relative engagement required under Section 2-27.3. 18    (2) The first permanency hearing shall be conducted by the 19judge. Subsequent permanency hearings may be heard by a judge 20or by hearing officers appointed or approved by the court in 21the manner set forth in Section 2-28.1 of this Act. The initial 22hearing shall be held (a) within 12 months from the date 23temporary custody was taken, regardless of whether an 24adjudication or dispositional hearing has been completed 25within that time frame, (b) if the parental rights of both 26parents have been terminated in accordance with the procedure   SB3251- 12 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1described in subsection (5) of Section 2-21, within 30 days of 2the order for termination of parental rights and appointment 3of a guardian with power to consent to adoption, or (c) in 4accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2-13.1. Subsequent 5permanency hearings shall be held every 6 months or more 6frequently if necessary in the court's determination following 7the initial permanency hearing, in accordance with the 8standards set forth in this Section, until the court 9determines that the plan and goal have been achieved. Once the 10plan and goal have been achieved, if the minor remains in 11substitute care, the case shall be reviewed at least every 6 12months thereafter, subject to the provisions of this Section, 13unless the minor is placed in the guardianship of a suitable 14relative or other person and the court determines that further 15monitoring by the court does not further the health, safety, 16or best interest of the child and that this is a stable 17permanent placement. The permanency hearings must occur within 18the time frames set forth in this subsection and may not be 19delayed in anticipation of a report from any source or due to 20the agency's failure to timely file its written report (this 21written report means the one required under the next paragraph 22and does not mean the service plan also referred to in that 23paragraph).24    The public agency that is the custodian or guardian of the 25minor, or another agency responsible for the minor's care, 26shall ensure that all parties to the permanency hearings are   SB3251- 13 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1provided a copy of the most recent service plan prepared 2within the prior 6 months at least 14 days in advance of the 3hearing. If not contained in the agency's service plan, the 4agency shall also include a report setting forth the 5following:6        (A) any special physical, psychological, educational, 7    medical, emotional, or other needs of the minor or the 8    minor's family that are relevant to a permanency or 9    placement determination, and for any minor age 16 or over, 10    a written description of the programs and services that 11    will enable the minor to prepare for independent living; 12        (B) beginning July 1, 2025, a written description of 13    ongoing family finding and relative engagement efforts in 14    accordance with the requirements under Section 2-27.3 the 15    agency has undertaken since the most recent report to the 16    court to plan for the emotional and legal permanency of 17    the minor;18        (C) whether a minor is placed in a licensed child care 19    facility under a corrective plan by the Department due to 20    concerns impacting the minor's safety and well-being. The 21    report shall explain the steps the Department is taking to 22    ensure the safety and well-being of the minor and that the 23    minor's needs are met in the facility;24        (D) detail regarding what progress or lack of progress 25    the parent has made in correcting the conditions requiring 26    the child to be in care; whether the child can be returned   SB3251- 14 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    home without jeopardizing the child's health, safety, and 2    welfare, what permanency goal is recommended to be in the 3    best interests of the child, and the reasons for the 4    recommendation. If a permanency goal under paragraph (A), 5    (B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) have been deemed 6    inappropriate and not in the minor's best interest, the 7    report must include the following information:8            (i) confirmation that the caseworker has discussed 9        the permanency options and subsidies available for 10        guardianship and adoption with the minor's caregivers, 11        the minor's parents, as appropriate, and has discussed 12        the available permanency options with the minor in an 13        age-appropriate manner;14            (ii) confirmation that the caseworker has 15        discussed with the minor's caregivers, the minor's 16        parents, as appropriate, and the minor as 17        age-appropriate, the distinctions between guardianship 18        and adoption, including, but not limited to, that 19        guardianship does not require termination of the 20        parent's rights or the consent of the parent;21            (iii) a description of the stated preferences and 22        concerns, if any, the minor, the parent as 23        appropriate, and the caregiver expressed relating to 24        the options of guardianship and adoption, and the 25        reasons for the preferences;26            (iv) if the minor is not currently in a placement   SB3251- 15 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        that will provide permanency, identification of all 2        persons presently willing and able to provide 3        permanency to the minor through either guardianship or 4        adoption, and beginning July 1, 2025, if none are 5        available, a description of the efforts made in 6        accordance with Section 2-27.3; and7            (v) state the recommended permanency goal, why 8        that goal is recommended, and why the other potential 9        goals were not recommended. 10    The caseworker must appear and testify at the permanency 11hearing. If a permanency hearing has not previously been 12scheduled by the court, the moving party shall move for the 13setting of a permanency hearing and the entry of an order 14within the time frames set forth in this subsection.15    (2.3) At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine 16the permanency goal of the child. The court shall set one of 17the following permanency goals:18        (A) The minor will be returned home by a specific date 19    within 5 months.20        (B) The minor will be in short-term care with a 21    continued goal to return home within a period not to 22    exceed one year, where the progress of the parent or 23    parents is substantial giving particular consideration to 24    the age and individual needs of the minor.25        (B-1) The minor will be in short-term care with a 26    continued goal to return home pending a status hearing.   SB3251- 16 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    When the court finds that a parent has not made reasonable 2    efforts or reasonable progress to date, the court shall 3    identify what actions the parent and the Department must 4    take in order to justify a finding of reasonable efforts 5    or reasonable progress and shall set a status hearing to 6    be held not earlier than 9 months from the date of 7    adjudication nor later than 11 months from the date of 8    adjudication during which the parent's progress will again 9    be reviewed.10        If the court has determined that goals (A), (B), and 11    (B-1) are not appropriate and not in the minor's best 12    interest, the court may select one of the following goals: 13    (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (H) for the minor as 14    appropriate and based on the best interests of the minor. 15    The court shall determine the appropriate goal for the 16    minor based on best interest factors and any 17    considerations outlined in that goal. 18        (C) The guardianship of the minor shall be transferred 19    to an individual or couple on a permanent basis. Prior to 20    changing the goal to guardianship, the court shall 21    consider the following: 22            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 23        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 24        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;25            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 26        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and   SB3251- 17 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 2        permanency goal;3            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 4        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 5        this familial identity;6            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 7        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 8        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 9        the Children and Family Services Act or in a certified 10        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 11        the Child Care Act of 1969; and12            (v) whether the parent or parents have been 13        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 14        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 15        parents have as to the permanency goal. 16        (D) The minor will be in substitute care pending court 17    determination on termination of parental rights. Prior to 18    changing the goal to substitute care pending court 19    determination on termination of parental rights, the court 20    shall consider the following: 21            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 22        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 23        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;24            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 25        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 26        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the   SB3251- 18 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        permanency goal;2            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 3        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 4        this familial identity;5            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 6        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 7        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 8        the Children and Family Services Act, in a certified 9        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 10        the Child Care Act of 1969;11            (v) whether the minor is already placed in a 12        pre-adoptive home, and if not, whether such a home has 13        been identified; and14            (vi) whether the parent or parents have been 15        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 16        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 17        parents have as to the permanency goal.18        (E) Adoption, provided that parental rights have been 19    terminated or relinquished.20        (F) Provided that permanency goals (A) through (E) 21    have been deemed inappropriate and not in the minor's best 22    interests, the minor over age 15 will be in substitute 23    care pending independence. In selecting this permanency 24    goal, the Department of Children and Family Services may 25    provide services to enable reunification and to strengthen 26    the minor's connections with family, fictive kin, and   SB3251- 19 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    other responsible adults, provided the services are in the 2    minor's best interest. The services shall be documented in 3    the service plan. 4        (G) The minor will be in substitute care because the 5    minor cannot be provided for in a home environment due to 6    developmental disabilities or mental illness or because 7    the minor is a danger to self or others, provided that 8    goals (A) through (E) have been deemed inappropriate and 9    not in the child's best interests.10    In selecting any permanency goal, the court shall indicate 11in writing the reasons the goal was selected. If the court has 12selected a permanency goal other than (A), (B), or (B-1), the 13court shall indicate in writing why permanency goals (A), (B), 14and (B-1) and why the preceding goals were deemed 15inappropriate and not in the child's best interest. Where the 16court has selected a permanency goal other than (A), (B), or 17(B-1), the Department of Children and Family Services shall 18not provide further reunification services, except as provided 19in paragraph (F) of this subsection (2.3), but shall provide 20services consistent with the goal selected.21        (H) Notwithstanding any other provision in this 22    Section, the court may select the goal of continuing 23    foster care as a permanency goal if: 24            (1) The Department of Children and Family Services 25        has custody and guardianship of the minor; 26            (2) The court has deemed all other permanency   SB3251- 20 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        goals inappropriate based on the child's best 2        interest; 3            (3) The court has found compelling reasons, based 4        on written documentation reviewed by the court, to 5        place the minor in continuing foster care. Compelling 6        reasons include: 7                (a) the child does not wish to be adopted or to 8            be placed in the guardianship of the minor's 9            relative, certified relative caregiver, or foster 10            care placement; 11                (b) the child exhibits an extreme level of 12            need such that the removal of the child from the 13            minor's placement would be detrimental to the 14            child; or 15                (c) the child who is the subject of the 16            permanency hearing has existing close and strong 17            bonds with a sibling, and achievement of another 18            permanency goal would substantially interfere with 19            the subject child's sibling relationship, taking 20            into consideration the nature and extent of the 21            relationship, and whether ongoing contact is in 22            the subject child's best interest, including 23            long-term emotional interest, as compared with the 24            legal and emotional benefit of permanence; 25            (4) The child has lived with the relative, 26        certified relative caregiver, or foster parent for at   SB3251- 21 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        least one year; and 2            (5) The relative, certified relative caregiver, or 3        foster parent currently caring for the child is 4        willing and capable of providing the child with a 5        stable and permanent environment. 6    (2.4) The court shall set a permanency goal that is in the 7best interest of the child. In determining that goal, the 8court shall consult with the minor in an age-appropriate 9manner regarding the proposed permanency or transition plan 10for the minor. The court's determination shall include the 11following factors:12        (A) Age of the child.13        (B) Options available for permanence, including both 14    out-of-state and in-state placement options.15        (C) Current placement of the child and the intent of 16    the family regarding subsidized guardianship and adoption.17        (D) Emotional, physical, and mental status or 18    condition of the child.19        (E) Types of services previously offered and whether 20    or not the services were successful and, if not 21    successful, the reasons the services failed.22        (F) Availability of services currently needed and 23    whether the services exist.24        (G) Status of siblings of the minor.25        (H) If the minor is not currently in a placement 26    likely to achieve permanency, whether there is an   SB3251- 22 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    identified and willing potential permanent caregiver for 2    the minor, and if so, that potential permanent caregiver's 3    intent regarding guardianship and adoption. 4    The court shall consider (i) the permanency goal contained 5in the service plan, (ii) the appropriateness of the services 6contained in the plan and whether those services have been 7provided, (iii) whether reasonable efforts have been made by 8all the parties to the service plan to achieve the goal, and 9(iv) whether the plan and goal have been achieved. All 10evidence relevant to determining these questions, including 11oral and written reports, may be admitted and may be relied on 12to the extent of their probative value.13    The court shall make findings as to whether, in violation 14of Section 8.2 of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 15Act, any portion of the service plan compels a child or parent 16to engage in any activity or refrain from any activity that is 17not reasonably related to remedying a condition or conditions 18that gave rise or which could give rise to any finding of child 19abuse or neglect. The services contained in the service plan 20shall include services reasonably related to remedy the 21conditions that gave rise to removal of the child from the home 22of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian or that 23the court has found must be remedied prior to returning the 24child home. Any tasks the court requires of the parents, 25guardian, or legal custodian or child prior to returning the 26child home must be reasonably related to remedying a condition   SB3251- 23 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1or conditions that gave rise to or which could give rise to any 2finding of child abuse or neglect. 3    If the permanency goal is to return home, the court shall 4make findings that identify any problems that are causing 5continued placement of the children away from the home and 6identify what outcomes would be considered a resolution to 7these problems. The court shall explain to the parents that 8these findings are based on the information that the court has 9at that time and may be revised, should additional evidence be 10presented to the court. 11    The court shall review the Sibling Contact Support Plan 12developed or modified under subsection (f) of Section 7.4 of 13the Children and Family Services Act, if applicable. If the 14Department has not convened a meeting to develop or modify a 15Sibling Contact Support Plan, or if the court finds that the 16existing Plan is not in the child's best interest, the court 17may enter an order requiring the Department to develop, 18modify, or implement a Sibling Contact Support Plan, or order 19mediation. 20    Beginning July 1, 2025, the court shall review the Ongoing 21Family Finding and Relative Engagement Plan required under 22Section 2-27.3. If the court finds that the plan is not in the 23minor's best interest, the court shall enter specific factual 24findings and order the Department to modify the plan 25consistent with the court's findings. 26    If the goal has been achieved, the court shall enter   SB3251- 24 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1orders that are necessary to conform the minor's legal custody 2and status to those findings.3    If, after receiving evidence, the court determines that 4the services contained in the plan are not reasonably 5calculated to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, 6the court shall put in writing the factual basis supporting 7the determination and enter specific findings based on the 8evidence. The court also shall enter an order for the 9Department to develop and implement a new service plan or to 10implement changes to the current service plan consistent with 11the court's findings. The new service plan shall be filed with 12the court and served on all parties within 45 days of the date 13of the order. The court shall continue the matter until the new 14service plan is filed. Except as authorized by subsection 15(2.5) of this Section and as otherwise specifically authorized 16by law, the court is not empowered under this Section to order 17specific placements, specific services, or specific service 18providers to be included in the service plan.19    A guardian or custodian appointed by the court pursuant to 20this Act shall file updated case plans with the court every 6 21months.22    Rights of wards of the court under this Act are 23enforceable against any public agency by complaints for relief 24by mandamus filed in any proceedings brought under this Act.25    (2.5) If, after reviewing the evidence, including evidence 26from the Department, the court determines that the minor's   SB3251- 25 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1current or planned placement is not necessary or appropriate 2to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 3shall put in writing the factual basis supporting its 4determination and enter specific findings based on the 5evidence. If the court finds that the minor's current or 6planned placement is not necessary or appropriate, the court 7may enter an order directing the Department to implement a 8recommendation by the minor's treating clinician or a 9clinician contracted by the Department to evaluate the minor 10or a recommendation made by the Department. If the Department 11places a minor in a placement under an order entered under this 12subsection (2.5), the Department has the authority to remove 13the minor from that placement when a change in circumstances 14necessitates the removal to protect the minor's health, 15safety, and best interest. If the Department determines 16removal is necessary, the Department shall notify the parties 17of the planned placement change in writing no later than 10 18days prior to the implementation of its determination unless 19remaining in the placement poses an imminent risk of harm to 20the minor, in which case the Department shall notify the 21parties of the placement change in writing immediately 22following the implementation of its decision. The Department 23shall notify others of the decision to change the minor's 24placement as required by Department rule. 25    (3) Following the permanency hearing, the court shall 26enter a written order that includes the determinations   SB3251- 26 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1required under subsections (2) and (2.3) of this Section and 2sets forth the following:3        (a) The future status of the minor, including the 4    permanency goal, and any order necessary to conform the 5    minor's legal custody and status to such determination; or6        (b) If the permanency goal of the minor cannot be 7    achieved immediately, the specific reasons for continuing 8    the minor in the care of the Department of Children and 9    Family Services or other agency for short-term placement, 10    and the following determinations:11            (i) (Blank).12            (ii) Whether the services required by the court 13        and by any service plan prepared within the prior 6 14        months have been provided and (A) if so, whether the 15        services were reasonably calculated to facilitate the 16        achievement of the permanency goal or (B) if not 17        provided, why the services were not provided.18            (iii) Whether the minor's current or planned 19        placement is necessary, and appropriate to the plan 20        and goal, recognizing the right of minors to the least 21        restrictive (most family-like) setting available and 22        in close proximity to the parents' home consistent 23        with the health, safety, best interest, and special 24        needs of the minor and, if the minor is placed 25        out-of-state, whether the out-of-state placement 26        continues to be appropriate and consistent with the   SB3251- 27 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        health, safety, and best interest of the minor.2            (iv) (Blank).3            (v) (Blank).4    (4) The minor or any person interested in the minor may 5apply to the court for a change in custody of the minor and the 6appointment of a new custodian or guardian of the person or for 7the restoration of the minor to the custody of the minor's 8parents or former guardian or custodian.9    When return home is not selected as the permanency goal:10        (a) The Department, the minor, or the current foster 11    parent or relative caregiver seeking private guardianship 12    may file a motion for private guardianship of the minor. 13    Appointment of a guardian under this Section requires 14    approval of the court.15        (b) The State's Attorney may file a motion to 16    terminate parental rights of any parent who has failed to 17    make reasonable efforts to correct the conditions which 18    led to the removal of the child or reasonable progress 19    toward the return of the child, as defined in subdivision 20    (D)(m) of Section 1 of the Adoption Act or for whom any 21    other unfitness ground for terminating parental rights as 22    defined in subdivision (D) of Section 1 of the Adoption 23    Act exists.24        When parental rights have been terminated for a 25    minimum of 3 years and the child who is the subject of the 26    permanency hearing is 13 years old or older and is not   SB3251- 28 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    currently placed in a placement likely to achieve 2    permanency, the Department of Children and Family Services 3    shall make reasonable efforts to locate parents whose 4    rights have been terminated, except when the Court 5    determines that those efforts would be futile or 6    inconsistent with the subject child's best interests. The 7    Department of Children and Family Services shall assess 8    the appropriateness of the parent whose rights have been 9    terminated, and shall, as appropriate, foster and support 10    connections between the parent whose rights have been 11    terminated and the youth. The Department of Children and 12    Family Services shall document its determinations and 13    efforts to foster connections in the child's case plan. 14    Custody of the minor shall not be restored to any parent, 15guardian, or legal custodian in any case in which the minor is 16found to be neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent 17under Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared 18for at home without endangering the minor's health or safety 19and it is in the best interest of the minor, and if such 20neglect, abuse, or dependency is found by the court under 21paragraph (1) of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about 22due to the acts or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, 23or legal custodian, until such time as an investigation is 24made as provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the 25issue of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor and 26the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to   SB3251- 29 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 2parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 3minor. If a motion is filed to modify or vacate a private 4guardianship order and return the child to a parent, guardian, 5or legal custodian, the court may order the Department of 6Children and Family Services to assess the minor's current and 7proposed living arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring 8of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor during 9the pendency of the motion to assist the court in making that 10determination. In the event that the minor has attained 18 11years of age and the guardian or custodian petitions the court 12for an order terminating the minor's guardianship or custody, 13guardianship or custody shall terminate automatically 30 days 14after the receipt of the petition unless the court orders 15otherwise. No legal custodian or guardian of the person may be 16removed without the legal custodian's or guardian's consent 17until given notice and an opportunity to be heard by the court.18    When the court orders a child restored to the custody of 19the parent or parents, the court shall order the parent or 20parents to cooperate with the Department of Children and 21Family Services and comply with the terms of an aftercare 22after-care plan, or risk the loss of custody of the child and 23possible termination of their parental rights. The court may 24also enter an order of protective supervision in accordance 25with Section 2-24.26    If the minor is being restored to the custody of a parent,   SB3251- 30 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1legal custodian, or guardian who lives outside of Illinois, 2and an Interstate Compact has been requested and refused, the 3court may order the Department of Children and Family Services 4to arrange for an assessment of the minor's proposed living 5arrangement and for ongoing monitoring of the health, safety, 6and best interest of the minor and compliance with any order of 7protective supervision entered in accordance with Section 82-24. 9    (5) Whenever a parent, guardian, or legal custodian files 10a motion for restoration of custody of the minor, and the minor 11was adjudicated neglected, abused, or dependent as a result of 12physical abuse, the court shall cause to be made an 13investigation as to whether the movant has ever been charged 14with or convicted of any criminal offense which would indicate 15the likelihood of any further physical abuse to the minor. 16Evidence of such criminal convictions shall be taken into 17account in determining whether the minor can be cared for at 18home without endangering the minor's health or safety and 19fitness of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.20        (a) Any agency of this State or any subdivision 21    thereof shall cooperate with the agent of the court in 22    providing any information sought in the investigation.23        (b) The information derived from the investigation and 24    any conclusions or recommendations derived from the 25    information shall be provided to the parent, guardian, or 26    legal custodian seeking restoration of custody prior to   SB3251- 31 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    the hearing on fitness and the movant shall have an 2    opportunity at the hearing to refute the information or 3    contest its significance.4        (c) All information obtained from any investigation 5    shall be confidential as provided in Section 5-150 of this 6    Act.7(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 8103-171, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, eff. 92-5-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; revised 8-20-25.) 10    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-107)11    Sec. 2-28. Court review. 12    (1) The court may require any legal custodian or guardian 13of the person appointed under this Act to report periodically 14to the court or may cite the legal custodian or guardian into 15court and require the legal custodian, guardian, or the legal 16custodian's or guardian's agency to make a full and accurate 17report of the doings of the legal custodian, guardian, or 18agency on behalf of the minor. The custodian or guardian, 19within 10 days after such citation, or earlier if the court 20determines it to be necessary to protect the health, safety, 21or welfare of the minor, shall make the report, either in 22writing verified by affidavit or orally under oath in open 23court, or otherwise as the court directs. Upon the hearing of 24the report the court may remove the custodian or guardian and 25appoint another in the custodian's or guardian's stead or   SB3251- 32 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1restore the minor to the custody of the minor's parents or 2former guardian or custodian. However, custody of the minor 3shall not be restored to any parent, guardian, or legal 4custodian in any case in which the minor is found to be 5neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent under 6Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared for at 7home without endangering the minor's health or safety and it 8is in the best interests of the minor, and if such neglect, 9abuse, or dependency is found by the court under paragraph (1) 10of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about due to the acts 11or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, or legal 12custodian, until such time as an investigation is made as 13provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the issue of 14the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to 15care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 16parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 17minor.18    (1.5) The public agency that is the custodian or guardian 19of the minor shall file a written report with the court no 20later than 15 days after a minor in the agency's care remains:21        (1) in a shelter placement beyond 30 days;22        (2) in a psychiatric hospital past the time when the 23    minor is clinically ready for discharge or beyond medical 24    necessity for the minor's health; or25        (3) in a detention center or Department of Juvenile 26    Justice facility solely because the public agency cannot   SB3251- 33 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    find an appropriate placement for the minor.2    The report shall explain the steps the agency is taking to 3ensure the minor is placed appropriately, how the minor's 4needs are being met in the minor's shelter placement, and if a 5future placement has been identified by the Department, why 6the anticipated placement is appropriate for the needs of the 7minor and the anticipated placement date. 8    (1.6) Within 30 days after placing a child in its care in a 9qualified residential treatment program, as defined by the 10federal Social Security Act, the Department of Children and 11Family Services shall prepare a written report for filing with 12the court and send copies of the report to all parties. Within 1320 days of the filing of the report, or as soon thereafter as 14the court's schedule allows but not more than 60 days from the 15date of placement, the court shall hold a hearing to consider 16the Department's report and determine whether placement of the 17child in a qualified residential treatment program provides 18the most effective and appropriate level of care for the child 19in the least restrictive environment and if the placement is 20consistent with the short-term and long-term goals for the 21child, as specified in the permanency plan for the child. The 22court shall approve or disapprove the placement. If 23applicable, the requirements of Sections 2-27.1 and 2-27.2 24must also be met. The Department's written report and the 25court's written determination shall be included in and made 26part of the case plan for the child. If the child remains   SB3251- 34 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1placed in a qualified residential treatment program, the 2Department shall submit evidence at each status and permanency 3hearing: 4        (A) demonstrating that ongoing on-going assessment of 5    the strengths and needs of the child continues to support 6    the determination that the child's needs cannot be met 7    through placement in a foster family home, that the 8    placement provides the most effective and appropriate 9    level of care for the child in the least restrictive, 10    appropriate environment, and that the placement is 11    consistent with the short-term and long-term permanency 12    goal for the child, as specified in the permanency plan 13    for the child; 14        (B) documenting the specific treatment or service 15    needs that should be met for the child in the placement and 16    the length of time the child is expected to need the 17    treatment or services; 18        (C) detailing the efforts made by the agency to 19    prepare the child to return home or to be placed with a fit 20    and willing relative, a legal guardian, or an adoptive 21    parent, or in a foster family home; 22        (D) beginning July 1, 2025, documenting the 23    Department's efforts regarding ongoing family finding and 24    relative engagement required under Section 2-27.3; and 25        (E) detailing efforts to ensure the minor is engaged 26    in age and developmentally appropriate activities to   SB3251- 35 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    develop life skills, which may include extracurricular 2    activities, coaching by caregivers, or instruction in 3    individual or group settings. For minors who have 4    participated in life skills assessments, the results of 5    such assessments and how the minor's identified needs are 6    being addressed. 7    (2) The first permanency hearing shall be conducted by the 8judge. Subsequent permanency hearings may be heard by a judge 9or by hearing officers appointed or approved by the court in 10the manner set forth in Section 2-28.1 of this Act. The initial 11hearing shall be held (a) within 12 months from the date 12temporary custody was taken, regardless of whether an 13adjudication or dispositional hearing has been completed 14within that time frame, (b) if the parental rights of both 15parents have been terminated in accordance with the procedure 16described in subsection (5) of Section 2-21, within 30 days of 17the order for termination of parental rights and appointment 18of a guardian with power to consent to adoption, or (c) in 19accordance with subsection (2) of Section 2-13.1. Subsequent 20permanency hearings shall be held every 6 months or more 21frequently if necessary in the court's determination following 22the initial permanency hearing, in accordance with the 23standards set forth in this Section, until the court 24determines that the plan and goal have been achieved. Once the 25plan and goal have been achieved, if the minor remains in 26substitute care, the case shall be reviewed at least every 6   SB3251- 36 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1months thereafter, subject to the provisions of this Section, 2unless the minor is placed in the guardianship of a suitable 3relative or other person and the court determines that further 4monitoring by the court does not further the health, safety, 5or best interest of the child and that this is a stable 6permanent placement. The permanency hearings must occur within 7the time frames set forth in this subsection and may not be 8delayed in anticipation of a report from any source or due to 9the agency's failure to timely file its written report (this 10written report means the one required under the next paragraph 11and does not mean the service plan also referred to in that 12paragraph).13    The public agency that is the custodian or guardian of the 14minor, or another agency responsible for the minor's care, 15shall ensure that all parties to the permanency hearings are 16provided a copy of the most recent service plan prepared 17within the prior 6 months at least 14 days in advance of the 18hearing. If not contained in the agency's service plan, the 19agency shall also include a report setting forth the 20following:21        (A) any special physical, psychological, educational, 22    medical, emotional, or other needs of the minor or the 23    minor's family that are relevant to a permanency or 24    placement determination, and for any minor age 16 or over, 25    a written description of the programs and services that 26    will enable the minor to prepare for independent living;   SB3251- 37 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        (B) beginning July 1, 2025, a written description of 2    ongoing family finding and relative engagement efforts in 3    accordance with the requirements under Section 2-27.3 the 4    agency has undertaken since the most recent report to the 5    court to plan for the emotional and legal permanency of 6    the minor;7        (C) whether a minor is placed in a licensed child care 8    facility under a corrective plan by the Department due to 9    concerns impacting the minor's safety and well-being. The 10    report shall explain the steps the Department is taking to 11    ensure the safety and well-being of the minor and that the 12    minor's needs are met in the facility;13        (D) detail regarding what progress or lack of progress 14    the parent has made in correcting the conditions requiring 15    the child to be in care; whether the child can be returned 16    home without jeopardizing the child's health, safety, and 17    welfare, what permanency goal is recommended to be in the 18    best interests of the child, and the reasons for the 19    recommendation. If a permanency goal under paragraph (A), 20    (B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) have been deemed 21    inappropriate and not in the minor's best interest, the 22    report must include the following information:23            (i) confirmation that the caseworker has discussed 24        the permanency options and subsidies available for 25        guardianship and adoption with the minor's caregivers, 26        the minor's parents, as appropriate, and has discussed   SB3251- 38 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        the available permanency options with the minor in an 2        age-appropriate manner;3            (ii) confirmation that the caseworker has 4        discussed with the minor's caregivers, the minor's 5        parents, as appropriate, and the minor as 6        age-appropriate, the distinctions between guardianship 7        and adoption, including, but not limited to, that 8        guardianship does not require termination of the 9        parent's rights or the consent of the parent;10            (iii) a description of the stated preferences and 11        concerns, if any, the minor, the parent as 12        appropriate, and the caregiver expressed relating to 13        the options of guardianship and adoption, and the 14        reasons for the preferences;15            (iv) if the minor is not currently in a placement 16        that will provide permanency, identification of all 17        persons presently willing and able to provide 18        permanency to the minor through either guardianship or 19        adoption, and beginning July 1, 2025, if none are 20        available, a description of the efforts made in 21        accordance with Section 2-27.3; and22            (v) state the recommended permanency goal, why 23        that goal is recommended, and why the other potential 24        goals were not recommended. 25    The caseworker must appear and testify at the permanency 26hearing. If a permanency hearing has not previously been   SB3251- 39 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1scheduled by the court, the moving party shall move for the 2setting of a permanency hearing and the entry of an order 3within the time frames set forth in this subsection.4    (2.3) At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine 5the permanency goal of the child. The court shall set one of 6the following permanency goals:7        (A) The minor will be returned home by a specific date 8    within 5 months.9        (B) The minor will be in short-term care with a 10    continued goal to return home within a period not to 11    exceed one year, where the progress of the parent or 12    parents is substantial giving particular consideration to 13    the age and individual needs of the minor.14        (B-1) The minor will be in short-term care with a 15    continued goal to return home pending a status hearing. 16    When the court finds that a parent has not made reasonable 17    efforts or reasonable progress to date, the court shall 18    identify what actions the parent and the Department must 19    take in order to justify a finding of reasonable efforts 20    or reasonable progress and shall set a status hearing to 21    be held not earlier than 9 months from the date of 22    adjudication nor later than 11 months from the date of 23    adjudication during which the parent's progress will again 24    be reviewed.25        If the court has determined that goals (A), (B), and 26    (B-1) are not appropriate and not in the minor's best   SB3251- 40 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    interest, the court may select one of the following goals: 2    (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (H) for the minor as 3    appropriate and based on the best interests of the minor. 4    The court shall determine the appropriate goal for the 5    minor based on best interest factors and any 6    considerations outlined in that goal. 7        (C) The guardianship of the minor shall be transferred 8    to an individual or couple on a permanent basis. Prior to 9    changing the goal to guardianship, the court shall 10    consider the following: 11            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 12        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 13        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;14            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 15        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 16        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 17        permanency goal;18            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 19        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 20        this familial identity;21            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 22        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 23        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 24        the Children and Family Services Act or in a certified 25        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 26        the Child Care Act of 1969; and  SB3251- 41 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1            (v) whether the parent or parents have been 2        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 3        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 4        parents have as to the permanency goal. 5        (D) The minor will be in substitute care pending court 6    determination on termination of parental rights. Prior to 7    changing the goal to substitute care pending court 8    determination on termination of parental rights, the court 9    shall consider the following: 10            (i) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 11        guardianship with the caregiver and what preference, 12        if any, the caregiver has as to the permanency goal;13            (ii) whether the agency has discussed adoption and 14        guardianship with the minor, as age-appropriate, and 15        what preference, if any, the minor has as to the 16        permanency goal;17            (iii) whether the minor is of sufficient age to 18        remember the minor's parents and if the child values 19        this familial identity;20            (iv) whether the minor is placed with a relative, 21        and beginning July 1, 2025, whether the minor is 22        placed in a relative home as defined in Section 4d of 23        the Children and Family Services Act, in a certified 24        relative caregiver home as defined in Section 2.36 of 25        the Child Care Act of 1969;26            (v) whether the minor is already placed in a   SB3251- 42 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        pre-adoptive home, and if not, whether such a home has 2        been identified; and3            (vi) whether the parent or parents have been 4        informed about guardianship and adoption, and, if 5        appropriate, what preferences, if any, the parent or 6        parents have as to the permanency goal.7        (E) Adoption, provided that parental rights have been 8    terminated or relinquished.9        (F) Provided that permanency goals (A) through (E) 10    have been deemed inappropriate and not in the minor's best 11    interests, the minor over age 15 will be in substitute 12    care pending independence. In selecting this permanency 13    goal, the Department of Children and Family Services may 14    provide services to enable reunification and to strengthen 15    the minor's connections with family, fictive kin, and 16    other responsible adults, provided the services are in the 17    minor's best interest. The services shall be documented in 18    the service plan. 19        (G) The minor will be in substitute care because the 20    minor cannot be provided for in a home environment due to 21    developmental disabilities or mental illness or because 22    the minor is a danger to self or others, provided that 23    goals (A) through (E) have been deemed inappropriate and 24    not in the child's best interests.25    In selecting any permanency goal, the court shall indicate 26in writing the reasons the goal was selected. If the court has   SB3251- 43 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1selected a permanency goal other than (A), (B), or (B-1), the 2court shall indicate in writing why permanency goals (A), (B), 3and (B-1) and why the preceding goals were deemed 4inappropriate and not in the child's best interest. Where the 5court has selected a permanency goal other than (A), (B), or 6(B-1), the Department of Children and Family Services shall 7not provide further reunification services, except as provided 8in paragraph (F) of this subsection (2.3), but shall provide 9services consistent with the goal selected.10        (H) Notwithstanding any other provision in this 11    Section, the court may select the goal of continuing 12    foster care as a permanency goal if: 13            (1) The Department of Children and Family Services 14        has custody and guardianship of the minor; 15            (2) The court has deemed all other permanency 16        goals inappropriate based on the child's best 17        interest; 18            (3) The court has found compelling reasons, based 19        on written documentation reviewed by the court, to 20        place the minor in continuing foster care. Compelling 21        reasons include: 22                (a) the child does not wish to be adopted or to 23            be placed in the guardianship of the minor's 24            relative, certified relative caregiver, or foster 25            care placement; 26                (b) the child exhibits an extreme level of   SB3251- 44 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1            need such that the removal of the child from the 2            minor's placement would be detrimental to the 3            child; or 4                (c) the child who is the subject of the 5            permanency hearing has existing close and strong 6            bonds with a sibling, and achievement of another 7            permanency goal would substantially interfere with 8            the subject child's sibling relationship, taking 9            into consideration the nature and extent of the 10            relationship, and whether ongoing contact is in 11            the subject child's best interest, including 12            long-term emotional interest, as compared with the 13            legal and emotional benefit of permanence; 14            (4) The child has lived with the relative, 15        certified relative caregiver, or foster parent for at 16        least one year; and 17            (5) The relative, certified relative caregiver, or 18        foster parent currently caring for the child is 19        willing and capable of providing the child with a 20        stable and permanent environment. 21    (2.4) The court shall set a permanency goal that is in the 22best interest of the child. In determining that goal, the 23court shall consult with the minor in an age-appropriate 24manner regarding the proposed permanency or transition plan 25for the minor. The court's determination shall include the 26following factors:  SB3251- 45 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1        (A) Age of the child.2        (B) Options available for permanence, including both 3    out-of-state and in-state placement options.4        (C) Current placement of the child and the intent of 5    the family regarding subsidized guardianship and adoption.6        (D) Emotional, physical, and mental status or 7    condition of the child.8        (E) Types of services previously offered and whether 9    or not the services were successful and, if not 10    successful, the reasons the services failed.11        (F) Availability of services currently needed and 12    whether the services exist.13        (G) Status of siblings of the minor.14        (H) If the minor is not currently in a placement 15    likely to achieve permanency, whether there is an 16    identified and willing potential permanent caregiver for 17    the minor, and if so, that potential permanent caregiver's 18    intent regarding guardianship and adoption. 19    The court shall consider (i) the permanency goal contained 20in the service plan, (ii) the appropriateness of the services 21contained in the plan and whether those services have been 22provided, (iii) whether reasonable efforts have been made by 23all the parties to the service plan to achieve the goal, and 24(iv) whether the plan and goal have been achieved. All 25evidence relevant to determining these questions, including 26oral and written reports, may be admitted and may be relied on   SB3251- 46 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1to the extent of their probative value.2    The court shall make findings as to whether, in violation 3of Section 8.2 of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 4Act, any portion of the service plan compels a child or parent 5to engage in any activity or refrain from any activity that is 6not reasonably related to remedying a condition or conditions 7that gave rise or which could give rise to any finding of child 8abuse or neglect. The services contained in the service plan 9shall include services reasonably related to remedy the 10conditions that gave rise to removal of the child from the home 11of the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian or that 12the court has found must be remedied prior to returning the 13child home. Any tasks the court requires of the parents, 14guardian, or legal custodian or child prior to returning the 15child home must be reasonably related to remedying a condition 16or conditions that gave rise to or which could give rise to any 17finding of child abuse or neglect. 18    If the permanency goal is to return home, the court shall 19make findings that identify any problems that are causing 20continued placement of the children away from the home and 21identify what outcomes would be considered a resolution to 22these problems. The court shall explain to the parents that 23these findings are based on the information that the court has 24at that time and may be revised, should additional evidence be 25presented to the court. 26    The court shall review the Sibling Contact Support Plan   SB3251- 47 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1developed or modified under subsection (f) of Section 7.4 of 2the Children and Family Services Act, if applicable. If the 3Department has not convened a meeting to develop or modify a 4Sibling Contact Support Plan, or if the court finds that the 5existing Plan is not in the child's best interest, the court 6may enter an order requiring the Department to develop, 7modify, or implement a Sibling Contact Support Plan, or order 8mediation. 9    The court shall review the Department's efforts to provide 10the minor with age and developmentally appropriate life 11skills. If the court finds the Department's efforts are not in 12the minor's best interest, the court may enter an order 13requiring the Department to develop, modify, or implement the 14service plan to develop the minor's life skills in an age and 15developmentally appropriate manner. 16    Beginning July 1, 2025, the court shall review the Ongoing 17Family Finding and Relative Engagement Plan required under 18Section 2-27.3. If the court finds that the plan is not in the 19minor's best interest, the court shall enter specific factual 20findings and order the Department to modify the plan 21consistent with the court's findings. 22    If the goal has been achieved, the court shall enter 23orders that are necessary to conform the minor's legal custody 24and status to those findings.25    If, after receiving evidence, the court determines that 26the services contained in the plan are not reasonably   SB3251- 48 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1calculated to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, 2the court shall put in writing the factual basis supporting 3the determination and enter specific findings based on the 4evidence. The court also shall enter an order for the 5Department to develop and implement a new service plan or to 6implement changes to the current service plan consistent with 7the court's findings. The new service plan shall be filed with 8the court and served on all parties within 45 days of the date 9of the order. The court shall continue the matter until the new 10service plan is filed. Except as authorized by subsection 11(2.5) of this Section and as otherwise specifically authorized 12by law, the court is not empowered under this Section to order 13specific placements, specific services, or specific service 14providers to be included in the service plan.15    A guardian or custodian appointed by the court pursuant to 16this Act shall file updated case plans with the court every 6 17months.18    Rights of wards of the court under this Act are 19enforceable against any public agency by complaints for relief 20by mandamus filed in any proceedings brought under this Act.21    (2.5) If, after reviewing the evidence, including evidence 22from the Department, the court determines that the minor's 23current or planned placement is not necessary or appropriate 24to facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 25shall put in writing the factual basis supporting its 26determination and enter specific findings based on the   SB3251- 49 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1evidence. If the court finds that the minor's current or 2planned placement is not necessary or appropriate, the court 3may enter an order directing the Department to implement a 4recommendation by the minor's treating clinician or a 5clinician contracted by the Department to evaluate the minor 6or a recommendation made by the Department. If the Department 7places a minor in a placement under an order entered under this 8subsection (2.5), the Department has the authority to remove 9the minor from that placement when a change in circumstances 10necessitates the removal to protect the minor's health, 11safety, and best interest. If the Department determines 12removal is necessary, the Department shall notify the parties 13of the planned placement change in writing no later than 10 14days prior to the implementation of its determination unless 15remaining in the placement poses an imminent risk of harm to 16the minor, in which case the Department shall notify the 17parties of the placement change in writing immediately 18following the implementation of its decision. The Department 19shall notify others of the decision to change the minor's 20placement as required by Department rule. 21    (3) Following the permanency hearing, the court shall 22enter a written order that includes the determinations 23required under subsections (2) and (2.3) of this Section and 24sets forth the following:25        (a) The future status of the minor, including the 26    permanency goal, and any order necessary to conform the   SB3251- 50 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    minor's legal custody and status to such determination; or2        (b) If the permanency goal of the minor cannot be 3    achieved immediately, the specific reasons for continuing 4    the minor in the care of the Department of Children and 5    Family Services or other agency for short-term placement, 6    and the following determinations:7            (i) (Blank).8            (ii) Whether the services required by the court 9        and by any service plan prepared within the prior 6 10        months have been provided and (A) if so, whether the 11        services were reasonably calculated to facilitate the 12        achievement of the permanency goal or (B) if not 13        provided, why the services were not provided.14            (iii) Whether the minor's current or planned 15        placement is necessary, and appropriate to the plan 16        and goal, recognizing the right of minors to the least 17        restrictive (most family-like) setting available and 18        in close proximity to the parents' home consistent 19        with the health, safety, best interest, and special 20        needs of the minor and, if the minor is placed 21        out-of-state, whether the out-of-state placement 22        continues to be appropriate and consistent with the 23        health, safety, and best interest of the minor.24            (iv) (Blank).25            (v) (Blank).26    If the court sets a permanency goal of independence or if   SB3251- 51 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1the minor is 17 years of age or older, the court shall schedule 2a Successful Transition to Adulthood Review hearing in 3accordance with Section 2-28.2. 4    (4) The minor or any person interested in the minor may 5apply to the court for a change in custody of the minor and the 6appointment of a new custodian or guardian of the person or for 7the restoration of the minor to the custody of the minor's 8parents or former guardian or custodian.9    When return home is not selected as the permanency goal:10        (a) The Department, the minor, or the current foster 11    parent or relative caregiver seeking private guardianship 12    may file a motion for private guardianship of the minor. 13    Appointment of a guardian under this Section requires 14    approval of the court.15        (b) The State's Attorney may file a motion to 16    terminate parental rights of any parent who has failed to 17    make reasonable efforts to correct the conditions which 18    led to the removal of the child or reasonable progress 19    toward the return of the child, as defined in subdivision 20    (D)(m) of Section 1 of the Adoption Act or for whom any 21    other unfitness ground for terminating parental rights as 22    defined in subdivision (D) of Section 1 of the Adoption 23    Act exists.24        When parental rights have been terminated for a 25    minimum of 3 years and the child who is the subject of the 26    permanency hearing is 13 years old or older and is not   SB3251- 52 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    currently placed in a placement likely to achieve 2    permanency, the Department of Children and Family Services 3    shall make reasonable efforts to locate parents whose 4    rights have been terminated, except when the Court 5    determines that those efforts would be futile or 6    inconsistent with the subject child's best interests. The 7    Department of Children and Family Services shall assess 8    the appropriateness of the parent whose rights have been 9    terminated, and shall, as appropriate, foster and support 10    connections between the parent whose rights have been 11    terminated and the youth. The Department of Children and 12    Family Services shall document its determinations and 13    efforts to foster connections in the child's case plan. 14    Custody of the minor shall not be restored to any parent, 15guardian, or legal custodian in any case in which the minor is 16found to be neglected or abused under Section 2-3 or dependent 17under Section 2-4 of this Act, unless the minor can be cared 18for at home without endangering the minor's health or safety 19and it is in the best interest of the minor, and if such 20neglect, abuse, or dependency is found by the court under 21paragraph (1) of Section 2-21 of this Act to have come about 22due to the acts or omissions or both of such parent, guardian, 23or legal custodian, until such time as an investigation is 24made as provided in paragraph (5) and a hearing is held on the 25issue of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor and 26the fitness of such parent, guardian, or legal custodian to   SB3251- 53 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1care for the minor and the court enters an order that such 2parent, guardian, or legal custodian is fit to care for the 3minor. If a motion is filed to modify or vacate a private 4guardianship order and return the child to a parent, guardian, 5or legal custodian, the court may order the Department of 6Children and Family Services to assess the minor's current and 7proposed living arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring 8of the health, safety, and best interest of the minor during 9the pendency of the motion to assist the court in making that 10determination. In the event that the minor has attained 18 11years of age and the guardian or custodian petitions the court 12for an order terminating the minor's guardianship or custody, 13guardianship or custody shall terminate automatically 30 days 14after the receipt of the petition unless the court orders 15otherwise. No legal custodian or guardian of the person may be 16removed without the legal custodian's or guardian's consent 17until given notice and an opportunity to be heard by the court.18    When the court orders a child restored to the custody of 19the parent or parents, the court shall order the parent or 20parents to cooperate with the Department of Children and 21Family Services and comply with the terms of an aftercare 22after-care plan, or risk the loss of custody of the child and 23possible termination of their parental rights. The court may 24also enter an order of protective supervision in accordance 25with Section 2-24.26    If the minor is being restored to the custody of a parent,   SB3251- 54 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1legal custodian, or guardian who lives outside of Illinois, 2and an Interstate Compact has been requested and refused, the 3court may order the Department of Children and Family Services 4to arrange for an assessment of the minor's proposed living 5arrangement and for ongoing monitoring of the health, safety, 6and best interest of the minor and compliance with any order of 7protective supervision entered in accordance with Section 82-24. 9    (5) Whenever a parent, guardian, or legal custodian files 10a motion for restoration of custody of the minor, and the minor 11was adjudicated neglected, abused, or dependent as a result of 12physical abuse, the court shall cause to be made an 13investigation as to whether the movant has ever been charged 14with or convicted of any criminal offense which would indicate 15the likelihood of any further physical abuse to the minor. 16Evidence of such criminal convictions shall be taken into 17account in determining whether the minor can be cared for at 18home without endangering the minor's health or safety and 19fitness of the parent, guardian, or legal custodian.20        (a) Any agency of this State or any subdivision 21    thereof shall cooperate with the agent of the court in 22    providing any information sought in the investigation.23        (b) The information derived from the investigation and 24    any conclusions or recommendations derived from the 25    information shall be provided to the parent, guardian, or 26    legal custodian seeking restoration of custody prior to   SB3251- 55 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    the hearing on fitness and the movant shall have an 2    opportunity at the hearing to refute the information or 3    contest its significance.4        (c) All information obtained from any investigation 5    shall be confidential as provided in Section 5-150 of this 6    Act.7(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 8103-171, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, eff. 92-5-25; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25; 104-107, eff. 7-1-26; revised 108-20-25.) 11    (705 ILCS 405/2-33)12    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-107)13    Sec. 2-33. Supplemental petition to reinstate wardship. 14    (1) Any time prior to a minor's 18th birthday, pursuant to 15a supplemental petition filed under this Section, the court 16may reinstate wardship and open a previously closed case when:17        (a) wardship and guardianship under the Juvenile Court 18    Act of 1987 was vacated in conjunction with the 19    appointment of a private guardian under the Probate Act of 20    1975 or under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987;21        (b) the minor is not presently a ward of the court 22    under Article II of this Act nor is there a petition for 23    adjudication of wardship pending on behalf of the minor; 24    and25        (c) it is in the minor's best interest that wardship   SB3251- 56 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    be reinstated.2    (2) Any time prior to a minor's 21st birthday, pursuant to 3a supplemental petition filed under this Section, the court 4may reinstate wardship and open a previously closed case when:5        (a) wardship and guardianship under this Act was 6    vacated pursuant to:7            (i) an order entered under subsection (2) of 8        Section 2-31 in the case of a minor over the age of 18;9            (ii) closure of a case under subsection (2) of 10        Section 2-31 in the case of a minor under the age of 18 11        who has been partially or completely emancipated in 12        accordance with the Emancipation of Minors Act; or13            (iii) an order entered under subsection (3) of 14        Section 2-31 based on the minor's attaining the age of 15        19 years before the effective date of this amendatory 16        Act of the 101st General Assembly;17        (b) the minor is not presently a ward of the court 18    under Article II of this Act nor is there a petition for 19    adjudication of wardship pending on behalf of the minor; 20    and21        (c) it is in the minor's best interest that wardship 22    be reinstated.23    (3) The supplemental petition must be filed in the same 24proceeding in which the original adjudication order was 25entered. Unless excused by court for good cause shown, the 26petitioner shall give notice of the time and place of the   SB3251- 57 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1hearing on the supplemental petition, in person or by mail, to 2the minor, if the minor is 14 years of age or older, and to the 3parties to the juvenile court proceeding. Notice shall be 4provided at least 3 court days in advance of the hearing date. 5Any hearing on a supplemental petition filed under subsection 6(1) for a change in custody shall be conducted consistent with 7Section 2-28 of this Act. 8    (3.5) Whenever a petition is filed to reinstate wardship 9pursuant to subsection (1), prior to granting the petition, 10the court may order the Department of Children and Family 11Services to assess the minor's current and proposed living 12arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring of the health, 13safety, and best interest of the minor during the pendency of 14the petition to assist the court in making that determination. 15    (4) A minor who is the subject of a petition to reinstate 16wardship under this Section shall be provided with 17representation in accordance with Sections 1-5 and 2-17 of 18this Act.19    (5) Whenever a minor is committed to the Department of 20Children and Family Services for care and services following 21the reinstatement of wardship under this Section, the 22Department shall:23        (a) Within 30 days of such commitment, prepare and 24    file with the court a case plan which complies with the 25    federal Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 26    and is consistent with the health, safety and best   SB3251- 58 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    interests of the minor; and2        (b) Promptly refer the minor for such services as are 3    necessary and consistent with the minor's health, safety 4    and best interests. 5(Source: P.A. 101-78, eff. 7-12-19; 102-489, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-107)7    Sec. 2-33. Supplemental petition to reinstate wardship. 8    (1) Any time prior to a minor's 18th birthday, pursuant to 9a supplemental petition filed under this Section, the court 10may reinstate wardship and open a previously closed case when:11        (a) wardship and guardianship under the Juvenile Court 12    Act of 1987 was vacated in conjunction with the 13    appointment of a private guardian under the Probate Act of 14    1975 or under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987;15        (b) the minor is not presently a ward of the court 16    under Article II of this Act nor is there a petition for 17    adjudication of wardship pending on behalf of the minor; 18    and19        (c) it is in the minor's best interest that wardship 20    be reinstated.21    (2) Any time prior to a minor's 21st birthday, pursuant to 22a supplemental petition filed under this Section, the court 23may reinstate wardship and open a previously closed case when:24        (a) wardship and guardianship under this Act was 25    vacated pursuant to:  SB3251- 59 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1            (i) an order entered under subsection (2) of 2        Section 2-31 in the case of a minor over the age of 18;3            (ii) closure of a case under subsection (2) of 4        Section 2-31 in the case of a minor under the age of 18 5        who has been partially or completely emancipated in 6        accordance with the Emancipation of Minors Act; or7            (iii) an order entered under subsection (3) of 8        Section 2-31 based on the minor's attaining the age of 9        19 years before the effective date of this amendatory 10        Act of the 101st General Assembly;11        (b) the minor is not presently a ward of the court 12    under Article II of this Act nor is there a petition for 13    adjudication of wardship pending on behalf of the minor; 14    and15        (c) it is in the minor's best interest that wardship 16    be reinstated.17    (3) The supplemental petition must be filed in the same 18proceeding in which the original adjudication order was 19entered. Unless excused by court for good cause shown, the 20petitioner shall give notice of the time and place of the 21hearing on the supplemental petition, in person or by mail, to 22the minor, if the minor is 14 years of age or older, and to the 23parties to the juvenile court proceeding. Notice shall be 24provided at least 3 court days in advance of the hearing date. 25Any hearing on a supplemental petition filed under subsection 26(1) for a change in custody shall be conducted consistent with   SB3251- 60 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1Section 2-28 of this Act. 2    (3.5) Whenever a petition is filed to reinstate wardship 3pursuant to subsection (1), prior to granting the petition, 4the court may order the Department of Children and Family 5Services to assess the minor's current and proposed living 6arrangements and to provide ongoing monitoring of the health, 7safety, and best interest of the minor during the pendency of 8the petition to assist the court in making that determination. 9    (4) A minor who is the subject of a petition to reinstate 10wardship under this Section shall be provided with 11representation in accordance with Sections 1-5 and 2-17 of 12this Act.13    (5) Whenever a minor is committed to the Department of 14Children and Family Services for care and services following 15the reinstatement of wardship under this Section, the 16Department shall:17        (a) Within 30 days of such commitment, prepare and 18    file with the court a case plan which complies with the 19    federal Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980 20    and is consistent with the health, safety and best 21    interests of the minor; and22        (b) Promptly refer the minor for such services as are 23    necessary and consistent with the minor's health, safety 24    and best interests. 25    (6) Whenever the court grants a petition to reinstate 26wardship under this Section, the court shall schedule the case   SB3251- 61 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1for a permanency hearing in accordance with Section 2-28 and a 2Successful Transition to Adulthood Review hearing in 3accordance with Section 2-28.2, if applicable. 4(Source: P.A. 104-107, eff. 7-1-26.) 5    Section 10. The Probate Act of 1975 is amended by changing 6Section 11-5 as follows: 7    (755 ILCS 5/11-5)  (from Ch. 110 1/2, par. 11-5)8    Sec. 11-5. Appointment of guardian. 9    (a) Upon the filing of a petition for the appointment of a 10guardian or on its own motion, the court may appoint a guardian 11of the estate or of both the person and estate, of a minor, or 12may appoint a guardian of the person only of a minor or minors, 13as the court finds to be in the best interest of the minor or 14minors.15    (a-1) A parent, adoptive parent or adjudicated parent, 16whose parental rights have not been terminated, may designate 17in any writing, including a will, a person qualified to act 18under Section 11-3 to be appointed as guardian of the person or 19estate, or both, of an unmarried minor or of a child likely to 20be born. A parent, adoptive parent or adjudicated parent, 21whose parental rights have not been terminated, or a guardian 22or a standby guardian of an unmarried minor or of a child 23likely to be born may designate in any writing, including a 24will, a person qualified to act under Section 11-3 to be   SB3251- 62 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1appointed as successor guardian of the minor's person or 2estate, or both. The designation must be witnessed by 2 or more 3credible witnesses at least 18 years of age, neither of whom is 4the person designated as the guardian. The designation may be 5proved by any competent evidence. If the designation is 6executed and attested in the same manner as a will, it shall 7have prima facie validity. The designation of a guardian or 8successor guardian does not affect the rights of the other 9parent in the minor.10    (b) The court lacks jurisdiction to proceed on a petition 11for the appointment of a guardian of a minor if it finds that 12(i) the minor has a living parent, adoptive parent or 13adjudicated parent, whose parental rights have not been 14terminated, whose whereabouts are known, and who is willing 15and able to make and carry out day-to-day child care decisions 16concerning the minor, unless: (1) the parent or parents 17voluntarily relinquished physical custody of the minor; (2) 18after receiving notice of the hearing under Section 11-10.1, 19the parent or parents fail to object to the appointment at the 20hearing on the petition; (3) the parent or parents consent to 21the appointment as evidenced by a written document that has 22been notarized and dated, or by a personal appearance and 23consent in open court; or (4) the parent or parents, due to an 24administrative separation, are unable to give consent to the 25appointment in person or by a notarized, written document as 26evidenced by a sworn affidavit submitted by the petitioner   SB3251- 63 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1describing the parent's or parents' inability to receive 2notice or give consent; or (ii) there is a guardian for the 3minor appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction. There 4shall be a rebuttable presumption that a parent of a minor is 5willing and able to make and carry out day-to-day child care 6decisions concerning the minor, but the presumption may be 7rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. If a short-term 8guardian has been appointed for the minor prior to the filing 9of the petition and the petitioner for guardianship is not the 10short-term guardian, there shall be a rebuttable presumption 11that it is in the best interest of the minor to remain in the 12care of the short-term guardian. The petitioner shall have the 13burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that it is 14not in the child's best interest to remain with the short-term 15guardian. 16    (b-1) If the court finds the appointment of a guardian of 17the minor to be in the best interest of the minor, and if a 18standby guardian has previously been appointed for the minor 19under Section 11-5.3, the court shall appoint the standby 20guardian as the guardian of the person or estate, or both, of 21the minor unless the court finds, upon good cause shown, that 22the appointment would no longer be in the best interest of the 23minor.24    (b-2) No petition for the appointment of a guardian of a 25minor shall be filed if the primary purpose of the filing is to 26reduce the financial resources available to the minor in order   SB3251- 64 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1to cause the minor to qualify for public or private financial 2assistance from an educational institution. The court may deny 3the petition if it finds by a preponderance of the evidence 4that the primary purpose of the filing is to enable the minor 5to declare financial independence so that the minor may obtain 6public or private financial assistance from an educational 7institution or a State or federal student financial aid 8program. 9    (b-3) If the minor is a youth in care under the 10guardianship of the Department of Children and Family Services 11pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 when the petition 12for the appointment of a guardian of a minor is filed, the 13court's determinations and findings shall be made consistent 14with subsection (4) of Section 2-28 of the Juvenile Court Act 15of 1987. Any motion to modify or vacate the appointment of a 16guardian of a minor who was a youth in care immediately 17preceding the filing of a petition for the appointment of a 18minor guardian shall be filed and reviewed pursuant to Section 192-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If custody and 20guardianship is to be restored to a parent or guardian who was 21a respondent in the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 case, the 22court's determinations and findings shall be made consistent 23with subsection (4) of Section 2-28 of the Juvenile Court Act 24of 1987. For purposes of this subsection, "youth in care" has 25the meaning provided in Section 4d of the Children and Family 26Services Act.   SB3251- 65 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1    (c) If the minor is 14 years of age or more, the minor may 2nominate the guardian of the minor's person and estate, 3subject to approval of the court. If the minor's nominee is not 4approved by the court or if, after notice to the minor, the 5minor fails to nominate a guardian of the minor's person or 6estate, the court may appoint the guardian without nomination.7    (d) The court shall not appoint as guardian of the person 8of the minor any person whom the court has determined had 9caused or substantially contributed to the minor becoming a 10neglected or abused minor as defined in the Juvenile Court Act 11of 1987, unless 2 years have elapsed since the last proven 12incident of abuse or neglect and the court determines that 13appointment of such person as guardian is in the best 14interests of the minor.15    (e) Previous statements made by the minor relating to any 16allegations that the minor is an abused or neglected child 17within the meaning of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 18Act, or an abused or neglected minor within the meaning of the 19Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall be admissible in evidence in 20a hearing concerning appointment of a guardian of the person 21or estate of the minor. No such statement, however, if 22uncorroborated and not subject to cross-examination, shall be 23sufficient in itself to support a finding of abuse or neglect.24(Source: P.A. 103-475, eff. 1-1-24.) 25    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes   SB3251- 66 -LRB104 20395 RLC 33855 b1changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 2that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 3represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 4not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 5made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 6Public Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.